tests/case.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../tki.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../tki.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[twol] genitive in -nin":
    تورکیا<np><top><gen>: تورکیانین
    هدیه<n><gen>: هدیەنیی
    تورکمانجه<n><gen>: تورکمانجەنین
    دیزی<n><gen>: دیزینین
    باغلاما<n><gen>: باغلامانین
    بالا<n><gen>: بالانین
    زوق<n><gen>: زوقنون
    وجدان<n><gen>: وجدانین
    داهی<n><gen>: داهینین

  "[twol] genitive in -in":
    ‌أوشاغ<n><gen>: أوشاغین
    هدف<n><gen>: هدفین
    إیو<n><gen>: إیوین
    برنامج<n><gen>: برنامجین
    شخص<n><gen>: شخصین
    مال<n><gen>: مالین
    
  "[twol] genitive in -un":
    قورت<n><gen>: قورتون
    تلفون<n><gen>: تلفونون
<<<<<<< HEAD
    
=======

  "[twol] genitive in just -n":
    شخص<n><gen>: شخصن
    مال<n><gen>: مالن
>>>>>>> 324b84cd06b8b50a4a87d1c042c29c24eb4e9568

  "[twol] genitive in -yün":
    گوزلوغ<n><gen>: گوزلوغیون
    مکتوپ<n><gen>: مکتوبیون

<<<<<<< HEAD
  "[twol] locative {D}:د":
   
    يل<n><loc>: يلدا
    دام<n><loc>: دامدا
  "[twol] locative {D}:ت":
    قیش<n><loc>: قیشته
    حاپیس<n><loc>: حاپیسته
    عدد<n><loc>: عددته
    دولت<n><loc>: دولتته
  "[twol] locative {A}:ه" :     
    قیش<n><loc>: قیشته
    إیو<n><loc>: ‌إیوده    
  "[twol] locative {A}:ا" :   
    دام<n><loc>: دامدا 
    يل<n><loc>: يلدا 

  "[twol] accuasative {y}:ي" : 
    خورما<n><acc>: خورمایی
    باغچا<n><acc>: باغچایی
  "[twol] accusative {y}:0" : 
    اوز<n><acc>: اوزو
    اوشاغ<n><acc>: اوشاغی
  "[twol] accusative {I}:و" : 
    قورت<n><acc>: قورتو
    اوز<n><acc>: اوزو
  "[twol] accusative {I}:ی" :
    خورما<n><acc>: خورمایی
    اوشاغ<n><acc>: اوشاغی
    دیل<n><acc>: دیلی
  "[twol] ablative {D}:د" :
    دام<n><abl>: دامدان
    دار<n><abl>: داردان 

  "[twol] ablative {D}:0" :

     یالان<n><abl>: یالانان
     نردوان<n><abl>: نردوانان
     الت<n><abl>: التان
  "[twol] ablative {D}:ت" :
     قیش<n><abl>: قیشتان
  "[twol] ins {D}:ت" :
     ات<n><abl>: اتتان
     ا‌حمد<n><abl>: احمدتان
  "[twol] ins {D}:د" :
     دایی<n><abl>: داییدان
=======
#  "[twol] {y}:0":
   
>>>>>>> 324b84cd06b8b50a4a87d1c042c29c24eb4e9568




 
                                                                         
    
